Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska43-4617
Effect of prior judicial order or agreement.

In a proceeding for a grant of custodial responsibility pursuant to sections 43-4613 to 43-4623, the following rules apply:

(1) A prior judicial order designating custodial responsibility in the event of deployment is binding on the court unless the circumstances meet the requirements of law of this state other than the Uniform Deployed Parents Custody and Visitation Act for modifying a judicial order regarding custodial responsibility.

(2) The court shall enforce a prior written agreement between the parents for designating custodial responsibility in the event of deployment, including an agreement executed under sections 43-4608 to 43-4612, unless the court finds that the agreement is contrary to the best interest of the child.

Laws 2015, LB219, § 17.